Utah statutes.
29-2-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Alcoholic beverage" has the same meaning as provided in Section 32B-1-102.

(2)  "Controlled substance" has the same meaning as provided in Section 58-37-2.

(3)  "Guest" means a person for whom an innkeeper was paid to provide temporary sleeping accommodations in a lodging establishment.

(4)  "Innkeeper" means the proprietor or designated employee of a proprietor of a lodging establishment.

(5)  "Lodging establishment" means a place providing temporary sleeping accommodations to the public, including any of the following:

(a)  a bed and breakfast establishment;

(b)  a boarding house;

(c)  a hotel;

(d)  an inn;

(e)  a lodging house;

(f)  a motel;

(g)  a resort; or

(h)  a rooming house.

(6)  "Minor" means an unemancipated person younger than 18 years of age.



Amended by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

